tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.aff
SFX W   er    í           e[cd]er
SFX W   er    í           [eo]er
SFX W   er    í           ender
SFX W   ener  uve         ener
SFX W   er    í           er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  ise         erer
SFX W   er    í           o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  ude         oder
SFX W   er    í           olver
SFX W   oner  use         oner
SFX W   er    í           or[cd]er
SFX W   er    je          raer
SFX W   ir    í           alir
SFX W   ir    í           ebir
SFX W   ecir  ije         ecir
SFX W   ir    í           edir
SFX W   ir    í           egir
SFX W   ir    í           emir
SFX W   ír    í           [eo]ír
SFX W   ir    í           eñir
SFX W   ir    í           enchir
SFX W   ir    í           endir
SFX W   enir  ine         enir
SFX W   ir    í           entir
SFX W   ir    í           erir
SFX W   ir    í           ernir
SFX W   ir    í           ertir
SFX W   ir    í           ervir
SFX W   ir    í           estir
SFX W   ir    í           eunir
SFX W   ir    í           etir
SFX W   ir    í           irir
SFX W   ir    í           orir
SFX W   ir    í           ormir
SFX W   cir   je          ducir
SFX W   ir    í           [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    í           [üu]ir
SFX W   ir    í           ullir
SFX W   ir    í           uñir
SFX W   ar    uviste      andar
SFX W   r     ste         [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     ste         [^n]dar
SFX W   r     ste         [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upiste      aber
SFX W   er    iste        [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  iciste      [fh]acer
SFX W   er    iste        aler
SFX W   er    íste        caer
SFX W   er    iste        e[cd]er
SFX W   er    íste        [eo]er
SFX W   ener  uviste      ener
SFX W   er    iste        ender
SFX W   er    iste        er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isiste      erer
SFX W   er    iste        o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udiste      oder
SFX W   er    iste        olver
SFX W   oner  usiste      oner
SFX W   er    iste        or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jiste       raer
SFX W   r     ste         alir
SFX W   r     ste         ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijiste      ecir
SFX W   r     ste         edir
SFX W   r     ste         egir
SFX W   r     ste         emir
SFX W   r     ste         [eo]ír
SFX W   r     ste         eñir
SFX W   r     ste         enchir
SFX W   r     ste         endir
SFX W   enir  iniste      enir
SFX W   r     ste         entir
SFX W   r     ste         erir
SFX W   r     ste         ernir
SFX W   r     ste         ertir
SFX W   r     ste         ervir
SFX W   r     ste         estir
SFX W   r     ste         eunir
SFX W   r     ste         etir
SFX W   r     ste         irir
SFX W   r     ste         orir
SFX W   r     ste         ormir
SFX W   cir   jiste       ducir
SFX W   r     ste         [^d]ucir
SFX W   r     ste         [üu]ir
SFX W   r     ste         ullir
SFX W   r     ste         uñir
SFX W   ar    uvo         andar
SFX W   ar    ó           [^a]ndar
SFX W   ar    ó           [^n]dar
SFX W   ar    ó           [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upo         aber
SFX W   er    ió          [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  izo         [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ió          aler
SFX W   er    yó          caer
SFX W   er    ió          e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yó          [eo]er
SFX W   er    ió          ender
SFX W   ener  uvo         ener
SFX W   er    ió          er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  iso         erer
SFX W   er    ió          o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udo         oder
SFX W   er    ió          olver
SFX W   oner  uso         oner
SFX W   er    ió          or[cd]er
SFX W   er    ió          order
SFX W   er    jo          raer
SFX W   r     ó           alir
SFX W   ebir  ibió        ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijo         ecir
SFX W   edir  idió        edir
SFX W   egir  igió        egir
SFX W   emir  imió        emir
SFX W   eír   ió          eír
SFX W   eñir  iñó         eñir
SFX W   eguir iguió       eguir
SFX W   enchir inchió      enchir
SFX W   endir indió       endir
SFX W   enir  ino         enir
SFX W   entir intió       entir
SFX W   erir  irió        erir
SFX W   r     ó           ernir
SFX W   ertir irtió       ertir
SFX W   ervir irvió       ervir
SFX W   estir istió       estir
SFX W   r     ó           eunir
SFX W   etir  itió        etir
SFX W   r     ó           irir
SFX W   r     ó           ohibir
SFX W   ír    yó          oír
SFX W   orir  urió        orir
SFX W   ormir urmió       ormir
SFX W   cir   jo          ducir
SFX W   r     ó           [^d]ucir
SFX W   ir    yó          [^g]uir
SFX W   üir   uyó         güir
SFX W   ir    ó           ullir
SFX W   ir    ó           uñir
SFX W   ar    uvimos      andar
SFX W   aber  upimos      aber
SFX W   er    imos        [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icimos      [fh]acer
SFX W   er    imos        aler
SFX W   er    ímos        caer
SFX W   er    imos        e[cd]er
SFX W   er    ímos        [eo]er
SFX W   er    imos        ender
SFX W   ener  uvimos      ener
SFX W   er    imos        er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isimos      erer
SFX W   er    imos        o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udimos      oder
SFX W   er    imos        olver
SFX W   oner  usimos      oner
SFX W   er    imos        or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jimos       raer
SFX W   ecir  ijimos      ecir
SFX W   enir  inimos      enir
SFX W   cir   jimos       ducir
SFX W   ar    uvisteis    andar
SFX W   r     steis       [^a]ndar
SFX W   r     steis       [^n]dar
SFX W   r     steis       [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upisteis    aber
SFX W   er    isteis      [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icisteis    [fh]acer
SFX W   er    isteis      aler
SFX W   er    ísteis      caer
SFX W   er    isteis      e[cd]er
SFX W   er    ísteis      [eo]er
SFX W   er    isteis      ender
SFX W   ener  uvisteis    ener
SFX W   er    isteis      er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isisteis    erer
SFX W   er    isteis      o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udisteis    oder
SFX W   er    isteis      olver
SFX W   oner  usisteis    oner
SFX W   er    isteis      or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jisteis     raer
SFX W   r     steis       alir
SFX W   r     steis       ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijisteis    ecir
SFX W   r     steis       edir
SFX W   r     steis       egir
SFX W   r     steis       emir
SFX W   r     steis       [eo]ír
SFX W   r     steis       eñir
SFX W   r     steis       enchir
SFX W   r     steis       endir
SFX W   enir  inisteis    enir
SFX W   r     steis       entir
SFX W   r     steis       erir
SFX W   r     steis       ernir
SFX W   r     steis       ertir
SFX W   r     steis       ervir
SFX W   r     steis       estir
SFX W   r     steis       eunir
SFX W   r     steis       etir
SFX W   r     steis       irir
SFX W   r     steis       orir
SFX W   r     steis       ormir
SFX W   cir   jisteis     ducir
SFX W   r     steis       [^d]ucir
SFX W   r     steis       [üu]ir
SFX W   r     steis       ullir
SFX W   r     steis       uñir
SFX W   ar    uvieron     andar
SFX W   0     on          [^a]ndar
SFX W   0     on          [^n]dar
SFX W   0     on          [^d]ar
SFX W   aber  upieron     aber
SFX W   er    ieron       [^fh]acer
SFX W   acer  icieron     [fh]acer
SFX W   er    ieron       aler
SFX W   er    yeron       caer
SFX W   er    ieron       e[cd]er
SFX W   er    yeron       [eo]er
SFX W   er    ieron       ender
SFX W   ener  uvieron     ener
SFX W   er    ieron       er[dnt]er
SFX W   erer  isieron     erer
SFX W   er    ieron       o[clv]er
SFX W   oder  udieron     oder
SFX W   er    ieron       olver
SFX W   oner  usieron     oner
SFX W   er    ieron       or[cd]er
SFX W   er    jeron       raer
SFX W   r     eron        alir
SFX W   ebir  ibieron     ebir
SFX W   ecir  ijeron      ecir
SFX W   edir  idieron     edir
SFX W   egir  igieron     egir
SFX W   emir  imieron     emir
SFX W   eír   ieron       eír
SFX W   eñir  iñeron      eñir
SFX W   eguir iguieron    eguir
SFX W   enchir inchieron   enchir
SFX W   endir indieron    endir
SFX W   enir  inieron     enir
SFX W   entir intieron    entir
SFX W   erir  irieron     erir
SFX W   r     eron        ernir
SFX W   ertir irtieron    ertir
SFX W   ervir irvieron    ervir
SFX W   estir istieron    estir
