tools/goldendict_for_japnese_portable/GoldenDict/content/morphology/es_ES.dic
abastar/OPQRSTVWX
abolir/HQTVWX
abrumar/OPQRSTVWX
acachetear/PSVWX
acapullar/OPRSVWX
acepar/PSVWX
achuchar/PQSTVWX
acolitar/PSVWX
acorrer/QTVWX
acuartillar/PSVWX
adarvar/PSVWX
adolecer/WX
afanar/OPRSVWX
afollar/PSWX
agañotar/PQSTVWX
aguijonear/PQSTVWX
ahumar/PSWX
alambrar/PSVWX
aldabear/PSVWX
aliar/OPRSWX
almonedar/PSVWX
alzar/IOPQRSTVWX
amantillar/PSVWX
amedrantar/PSVWX
amohinar/PSWX
amparar/OPQRSTVWX
anchoar/PSVWX
anteponer/WY
apandillar/PSVWX
apedrear/IOPQRSTVWX
apilar/IPSVWX
aporrear/IPQSTVWX
apuñalar/IPQSTVWX
arder/LVWX
arramblar/PSVWX
arrimar/OPQRSTVWX
asalmerar/PSVWX
aseverar/HPSVWX
asumir/OQRTVWX
atascar/IOPQRSTVWX
atiplar/PSVWX
atraillar/PQSTVWX
atusar/PSVWX
avejigar/PSVWX
ayunar/LPSVWX
bachear/PSVWX
ballestear/PQSTVWX
barbechar/PSVWX
barzonear/PSVWX
bañar/OPQRSTVWX
binar/HPSVWX
bocadear/PSVWX
borbotear/PSVWX
bribonear/PSVWX
burlar/OPQRSTVWX
cabrillear/PSVWX
calandrar/PSVWX
caminar/LPSVWX
cantusar/PSVWX
carburar/HLPSVWX
cascamajar/PSVWX
cauterizar/HPSVWX
cencerrear/PSVWX
chaflanar/PSVWX
chapuzar/PSVWX
chingar/PSVWX
chuflar/PSVWX
cinematografiar/PQSTWX
claudicar/HPSVWX
cocer/ILOQRTWX
colegir/WX
comparecer/LWX
concentrar/HOPQRSTVWX
conferir/QWY
conmensurar/HPSVWX
constreñir/QWY
contraer/OQWY
contribuir/WY
copear/PSVWX
corretear/PSVWX
coyotear/PQSTVWX
cromar/PSVWX
cucharetear/PSVWX
curar/HOPQRSTVWX
decalcificar/OPQRSTVWX
defenestrar/HPQSTVWX
demarcar/HPSVWX
denudar/HPSVWX
derrochar/PQSTVWX
desacompañar/IPSVWX
desaguar/PSWX
desalinizar/PQSTVWX
desanclar/PSVWX
desapuntalar/PQSTVWX
desasistir/OQRTVWX
desautorizar/HOPQRSTVWX
desbeber/VWX
descafeinar/PQSTVWX
descantillar/PSVWX
descascarillar/PSVWX
descimbrar/IPSVWX
descompaginar/PSVWX
descorchar/PQSTVWX
descruzar/PSVWX
desear/OPQRSTVWX
desemborrachar/PSVWX
desemparvar/PSVWX
desencallar/PSVWX
desendiablar/PSVWX
desengranar/PSVWX
desensartar/PSVWX
desenvainar/PQSTVWX
desfalcar/PQSTVWX
desganar/OPQRSTVWX
desgreñar/PSVWX
deshilachar/OPQRSTVWX
desincrustar/LPSVWX
deslavazar/PSVWX
desmajolar/PSWX
desmembrar/HOPQRSTWX
desmullir/QWY
desopilar/HPSVWX
despaldar/PSVWX
desparrancar/OPRSVWX
despiojar/PSVWX
desquilatar/PSVWX
destoser/ORVWX
desvestir/OQWY
difamar/HPQSTVWX
discursear/PSVWX
docilitar/PSVWX
ejemplarizar/LPQSTVWX
embarnizar/PSVWX
emborrizar/PQSTVWX
empacar/IOPRSVWX
empelazgar/OPRSVWX
empotrerar/PSVWX
encabar/PSVWX
encandilar/PSVWX
encasillar/IPQSTVWX
enchiquerar/IPSVWX
encorralar/PSVWX
enemistar/OPQRSTVWX
engaitar/PSVWX
engrandecer/IOQRTWX
enjambrar/PSVWX
enlutar/PSVWX
enrasar/IPSVWX
ensenar/PSVWX
entizar/PQSTVWX
entretallar/PSVWX
envasar/PQSTVWX
erradicar/HPQSTVWX
escandir/VWX
escobillar/PSVWX
esforrocinar/PSVWX
espeluzar/PSVWX
estañar/PQSTVWX
exigir/OQRTUVWX
exultar/HLPSVWX
fervorizar/OPQRSTVWX
focalizar/HOPQRSTVWX
frustrar/HLOPQRSTUVWX
garrear/PSVWX
gozar/OPQRSTVWX
guillotinar/PSVWX
hechizar/PQSTVWX
hipar/PSVWX
hospitalizar/HPQSTVWX
imantar/HPSVWX
inclinar/HOPQRSTVWX
infligir/QTVWX
instigar/HPSVWX
invaginar/HPSVWX
jaropear/PSVWX
lacrar/PSVWX
latinear/PSVWX
lignificar/HOPQRSTVWX
lubricar/HLPSVWX
malcomer/VWX
mandrilar/PQSTVWX
margenar/PQSTVWX
mayear/PSVWX
mercantilizar/PQSTVWX
mineralizar/HOPQRSTVWX
molliznear/PSVWX
motejar/PSVWX
muñequear/PSVWX
normalizar/HPQSTVWX
ojalar/PSVWX
oscilar/HLPSVWX
palotear/PSVWX
participar/HLPSVWX
peligrar/PSVWX
pernoctar/PSVWX
pimplar/PQSTVWX
planchear/PSVWX
polvificar/PSVWX
precaver/NOQRTVWX
presidir/QTVWX
prometer/IOQRTVWX
pulsear/PSVWX
quitar/HIOPQRSTUVWX
rasgar/OPQRSTVWX
reanudar/HOPQRSTVWX
recabar/PQSTVWX
reclasificar/HOPQRSTVWX
recrujir/VWX
reensayar/PQSTVWX
regentear/PSVWX
relabrar/PSVWX
remirar/PSVWX
repeler/VWX
requebrar/PSWX
respingar/PSVWX
retinglar/PSVWX
revenir/IWY
rizar/OPQRSTVWX
ruchar/PSVWX
saldar/PQSTVWX
satisfacer/LOQRTWY
sextuplicar/HPSVWX
sobrar/LNPSVWX
sobresembrar/PQSTWX
soltar/OPQRSTUWX
sotanear/PSVWX
sumir/OQRTVWX
taconear/PSVWX
tatarear/PQSTVWX
tercerear/PSVWX
tizonear/PSVWX
tramar/PSVWX
traquear/PSVWX
trasponer/OQRTWY
trisecar/PSVWX
turibular/PSVWX
vagabundear/PSVWX
ventear/PSVWX
visitar/HLOPQRSTVWX
zamarrear/PQSTVWX
zurear/PSVWX
